North Carolina, session 2025, HB907.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Part 2 of Article 13 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes is amended
by adding a new section to read:
"§ 143B-1042.25. Disaster Readiness and Response Fund.
The Disaster Readiness and Response Fund is established as a special fund in the Office of
the State Treasurer. The Fund shall be separate and distinct from the General Fund and all other
funds and reserves."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H907-v-1*